Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2712.06
Agreement; effect.

The agreement is an accord among individual cooperating sovereigns in furtherance of their governmental functions. The agreement provides a mechanism among the member states to establish and maintain a cooperative, simplified system for the application and administration of sales and use taxes under the duly adopted law of each member state.

Laws 2001, LB 172, § 7.